Hawaii, session 2025, SB1387.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that a main goal of the department of education's State of Hawaii public education 2023-2029 strategic plan is to have "all students graduate high school prepared for college and career success and community and civic engagement."  As part of this goal, an action item in the strategic plan includes "expand[ing] students' opportunities for structured work-based learning experiences, including internships for high school students, through partnerships with employers, community partners, military and higher education institutions." To achieve the goals set forth in the strategic plan, the department of education is actively pursuing internships for students, including graduating high school students.  However, the department finds that once students graduate from high school, they are no longer considered a student and are not covered for workers' compensation while they are participating in a department-sponsored work-based learning opportunity during the summer following graduation. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to allow newly graduated former students to be eligible for workers' compensation coverage during the summer following their high school graduation while participating in work-based learning programs sponsored by the department of education. SECTION 2.  Section 302A-430, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§302A-430  Coverage for workers' compensation.  Whenever a student or a new high school graduate participating in a school-approved work-based learning program sponsored by the department [of education] or a student participating in a school-approved work-based learning program sponsored by the [University] university of Hawaii undertakes to perform work for a private or public employer as part of the student's or new high school graduate's work-based learning program, whether paid or unpaid, the State shall be deemed to be the responsible employer for the purposes of workers' compensation coverage[,]; provided that no coverage under this section shall be provided beyond July 31 of the student's or the new high school graduate's high school graduation year, and that coverage shall be the student's or the new high school graduate's exclusive remedy to the same extent as provided for in chapter 386 as against the State and the private employer participating in the program." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST